Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.710

Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Sec. 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

[ 2015 c 176 s 1703.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.